pt-BR: Base do cream cheese: Leite de vaca A2; Amêndoa; Leite de búfala; Castanha de caju; Coco; Leite de vaca; Leite de cabra; Leite de ovelha; Soja; Outros
el: Βάση τυριού κρέμας: Αγελαδινό γάλα A2; Αμύγδαλο; Γάλα βουβαλιού; Κάσιους; Καρύδα; Αγελαδινό γάλα; Κατσικίσιο γάλα; Πρόβειο γάλα; Σόγια; Άλλο
cs: Základ z krémového sýra: Kravské mléko A2; Mandle; Buvolí mléko; Kešu; Kokos; Kravské mléko; Kozí mléko; Ovčí mléko; Sója; Ostatní
bg-BG: Форма/текстура на крем сиренето: Краве мляко А2; Бадем; Биволско мляко; Кашу; Кокос; Краве мляко; Козе мляко; Овче мляко; Соя; Други
nb: Kremostbase: A2-kumelk; Mandel; Bøffelmelk; Cashew; Kokos; Kumelk; Geitemelk; Sauemelk; Soya; Annet
sv: Färskostbas: A2-komjölk; Mandel; Buffelmjölk; Cashew; Kokos; Komjölk; Getmjölk; Fårmjölk; Soja; Övrigt
en: Cream cheese base: A2 cow milk; Almond; Buffalo milk; Cashew; Coconut; Cow milk; Goat milk; Sheep milk; Soy; Other
zh-CN: 奶油奶酪基底: A2 牛奶; 扁桃仁; 水牛奶; 腰果; 椰子; 牛奶; 羊奶; 绵羊奶; 大豆; 其他
fi: Tuorejuuston raaka-ainepohja: A2-lehmänmaito; Manteli; Puhvelinmaito; Cashew; Kookos; Lehmänmaito; Vuohenmaito; Lampaanmaito; Soija; Muu
da: Flødeostbund: A2-komælk; Mandel; Bøffelmælk; Cashewnød; Kokos; Komælk; Gedemælk; Fåremælk; Soja; Andet
fr: Base du fromage frais à tartiner: Lait de vache A2; Amande; Lait de bufflonne; Noix de cajou; Noix de coco; Lait de vache; Lait de chèvre; Lait de brebis; Soja; Autre
ko: 크림치즈 베이스: A2 우유; 아몬드; 물소유; 캐슈넛; 코코넛; 우유; 산양유; 양유; 대두; 기타
sl-SI: Osnova kremnega sira: Kravje mleko A2; Mandelj; Bivolje mleko; Indijski orešček; Kokos; Kravje mleko; Kozje mleko; Ovčje mleko; Soja; Drugo
hr-HR: Baza od krem sira: Kravlje mlijeko A2; Badem; Bivolje mlijeko; Indijski oraščić; Kokos; Kravlje mlijeko; Kozje mlijeko; Ovčje mlijeko; Soja; Ostalo
nl: Roomkaas basis: A2-koemelk; Amandel; Buffelmelk; Cashew; Kokosnoot; Koemelk; Geitenmelk; Schapenmelk; Soja; Overige
es: Base del queso crema: Leche de vaca A2; Almendra; Leche de búfala; Anacardo; Coco; Leche de vaca; Leche de cabra; Leche de oveja; Soya; Otro
hu: Krémsajt alapanyaga: A2 tehéntej; Mandula; Bivalytej; Kesudió; Kókusz; Tehéntej; Kecsketej; Juhtej; Szója; Egyéb
vi: Thành phần cơ bản của phô mai kem: Sữa bò A2; Hạnh nhân; Sữa trâu; Hạt điều; Dừa; Sữa bò; Sữa dê; Sữa cừu; Đậu nành; Khác
ja: クリームチーズベース: A2牛乳; アーモンド; バッファローミルク; カシューナッツ; ココナッツ; 牛乳; ゴートミルク; シープミルク; 大豆; その他
lt-LT: Kreminio sūrio pagrindas: A2 karvių pienas; Migdolų; Buivolių pienas; Anakardžių; Kokosų; Karvių pienas; Ožkų pienas; Avių pienas; Sojų; Kita
ro-RO: Bază pentru crema de brânză: Lapte de vacă A2; Migdale; Lapte de bivoliță; Caju; Nucă de cocos; Lapte de vacă; Lapte de capră; Lapte de oaie; Soia; Altele
tr: Krem peynir bazı: A2 inek sütü; Badem; Manda sütü; Kaju; Hindistan cevizi; İnek sütü; Keçi sütü; Koyun sütü; Soya; Diğer
pt-PT: Base de queijo cremoso: Leite de vaca A2; Amêndoa; Leite de búfala; Caju; Coco; Leite de vaca; Leite de cabra; Leite de ovelha; Soja; Outro
zh-TW: 奶油乳酪基底: A2 牛奶; 杏仁; 水牛奶; 腰果; 椰子; 牛奶; 羊奶; 綿羊奶; 大豆; 其他
th: ส่วนผสมหลักของครีมชีส: นมวัว A2; อัลมอนด์; นมควาย; เม็ดมะม่วงหิมพานต์; มะพร้าว; นมวัว; นมแพะ; นมแกะ; ถั่วเหลือง; อื่นๆ
ru: Основа сливочного сыра: Коровье молоко А2; Миндаль; Буйволиное молоко; Кешью; Кокос; Коровье молоко; Козье молоко; Овечье молоко; Соя; Другое
pl: Baza serka śmietankowego: Mleko krowie A2; Migdały; Mleko bawole; Nerkowce; Kokos; Mleko krowie; Mleko kozie; Mleko owcze; Soja; Inne
sk-SK: Základ zo smotanového syra: Kravské mlieko A2; Mandle; Byvolie mlieko; Kešu; Kokos; Kravské mlieko; Kozie mlieko; Ovčie mlieko; Sója; Iné
de: Basis des Frischkäses: A2-Kuhmilch; Mandel; Büffelmilch; Cashew; Kokosnuss; Kuhmilch; Ziegenmilch; Schafsmilch; Soja; Andere
it: base di formaggio cremoso: Latte vaccino A2; Mandorla; Latte di bufala; Anacardo; Cocco; Latte vaccino; Latte di capra; Latte di pecora; Soia; Altro